Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.070

Terms of office—Vacancies.

(1) The regular terms of office of each elected member of the commission shall be three years, except that the term of office for the initial members shall be as follows:

(a) Positions for areas one, four, and seven - one year.

(b) Positions for areas two, five, and eight - two years.

(c) Positions for areas three, six, and nine - three years.

(d) If filled, position for area eleven - three years.

(2) No elected member of the board may serve more than two full consecutive three-year terms.

(3) Terms of office shall end on August 31 of the last year of the elected or appointed term.

(4) Any vacancies on the commission shall be filled by a person meeting the qualifications established in *section 37 of this act appointed by the other voting members of the commission. The appointee shall hold office for the remainder of the term, at which time an election for that position shall be conducted.

[ 1989 c 5 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "section 37 of this act" is incorrect. Apparently a reference to "section 5 of this act," codified as RCW 15.62.060, was intended.